Utah statutes.
63G-6-202 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Powers and duties of board.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 63G-6-104 and Subsection 63G-6-208(1)(b), the policy board shall:

(a)  make rules, consistent with this chapter, governing the procurement, management, and control of any and all supplies, services, technology, and construction to be procured by the state; and

(b)  consider and decide matters of policy within the provisions of this chapter, including those referred to it by the chief procurement officer.

(2) (a)  The policy board may:

(i)  audit and monitor the implementation of its rules and the requirements of this chapter;

(ii)  upon the request of a local public procurement unit, review that procurement unit's proposed rules to ensure that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter; and

(iii)  approve the use of innovative procurement methods proposed by local public procurement units.

(b) Except as provided in Section 63G-6-807, the policy board may not exercise authority over the award or administration of:

(i)  any particular contact; or

(ii)  over any dispute, claim, or litigation pertaining to any particular contract.

